District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4608

Conversion by commission merchant, consignee, person selling goods on commission, and auctioneers

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(e)-(o), 29 DCR 3976
1981 Ed., §§ 22-1201 to 22-1211.